Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.045

Cities with a population of four hundred thousand or more—Appointment of additional commissioners—Appointment, compensation of commissioners—Organization of authority.

(1) After June 11, 1998, the governing body of a city with a population of four hundred thousand or more, that has created a housing authority under RCW 35.82.040, shall adopt a resolution to expand the number of commissioners on the housing authority from five to seven. Upon receiving the notice, the mayor, with approval of the city council, shall appoint additional persons as commissioners of the authority created for the city.

(2) In appointing commissioners, the mayor shall consider persons that represent the community, provided that two commissioners shall consist of tenants that reside in a housing project that is owned by the housing authority.

(3) After June 11, 1998, all commissioners shall be appointed to serve four-year terms, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term. A commissioner of an authority may not be an officer or employee of the city for which the authority is created. A commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and has qualified, unless sooner removed according to this chapter.

(4) A commissioner may be reappointed only after review and approval by the city council.

(5) A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk and the certificate is conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of the commissioner.

(6) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his or her services for the authority, in any capacity, but he or she is entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties.

(7) The powers of each authority vest in the commissioners of the authority in office from time to time. Four commissioners shall constitute a quorum of the authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws of the authority shall require a larger number.

(8) The mayor, with consent of the city council, shall designate which of the commissioners appointed shall be the first chair of the commission and he or she shall serve in the capacity of chair until the expiration of his or her term of office as commissioner. When the office of the chair of the authority becomes vacant, the authority shall select a chair from among its commissioners. An authority shall select from among its commissioners a vice chair, and the authority may employ a secretary, who shall be executive director, technical experts and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as the authority requires, and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation.

(9) For such legal services as it may require, an authority may call upon the chief law officer of the city or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

[ 1998 c 140 s 2.]